hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-de-1901.tex
u2r1att
ur1au
2u1rä
ur1äl
ur1ä2m
ur1än
ur3b2a
2urc
urch1
urchas4
urcht3e
ur3d2a
ur3d2i
ure1e
ur1eff
ur1eig
u2rele
ure2n
ure4na
u4ren4se
u4rentn
u2r1ep
urer3h
urer3k
ur2ert
u2rerw
ur1eta
ur2e3th
ure3u
2urf
ur2f3l
ur2fro
urf4spr
urf3t
ur6gense
urg3inn
urg1l
ur2gla
ur2gri
uri2c
ur1ide
uri3en
u2r1ind
urin6sek
urin8stin
u2ri2so
2urli
ur4matt
ur2m1au
urm2ei
ur4mern
urmet1
ur2mum
ur2mun
ur3n2e
2u1ro
urob2l
ur1off
uroh2
uros4
urost2
2u1rö
ur3p4
2urr
ur3re
ur2rh
3ursac
ur2san
ursau4
ur2s1er
ur2s1of
ur2spa
ur2sun
urt2
2urta
ur4tai
urt3ein
ur2tro
urts2c
urts1t
u3ru
ur2z1a
ur2zä
ur2z1ec
ur2zep
ur2zi
ur2z1op
urzt4
ur2z1w
2us
us3a2b
usa2gi
u4s1amb
u4samt
u2sang
us2ann
us3ark
us5art
usa4s
us1ast
us3ate
u1sä
u2säh
u2s1äs
u2sce
u4schab
u4schak
u3sche.
u4schef
usch5eic
u4sch3eu
u3schi
usch3mü
u3schu
usch5wer
u3se.
u3s2e3b
u2s1ec
use2ei
u2s1ei
u4sen4se
u4sentl
u3sep
use4rec
u2s1erl
u2serp
us1erw
u2s1ese
u2sex
u2sid
usi3er.
usi5ers.
u3sig
usi4kat
us1inn
us3kl
u4sko
usmas2
usma5sse
u1so
us3oc
us1oh
u3sol
u2sop
us1orc
us1ou
u1sö
u1sp
u2spac
us3part
u2s1pas
u3spec
u3spek
u2sph
us1pic
u2spo
us2por
u2spu
usrich7
us2s3ad
us2s3eb
usse4g
u4s3sel
us2se4n
us5sende
us6seni
us2sep
us2ser
us3ser.
uss3erf
usser4z
us2sez
u3s2sig
uss3k
us2sof
us2sum
u2stab
u3stad
u3stal
us2ten
us4ter
ust3erl
u3stis
u2s1tor
u2s3trä
u4strit
us2tum
u2s1tur
u1su
u2sumd
u2sumg
u2sumz
3usus
2uß
u2ß1u
2u1t
4ut.
u3ta.
u3taf
u2t1alt
ut1a2m
ut2ans
u2t1ap
u2t1ar
u2taut
ut1äh
u2tär
ut3c
u3te.
u4t1e2d
ut1ei.
ut1eie
ut1ein
ut1ela
ute2n1
uten2a
u2tent
ute4ral
ute5r4er
ute6ring
uter3k
ute4ros
u3t2es
ut2et
u2t2ev
u2t1ex
utfi2
ut3hal
ut3hei
ut1hel
u2t1hi
u2t1ho
u2thu
u2t1id
u4tigel
uti2vi
utli4n
utmas2
utma5sse
u3to.
uto3c
u5to3m
uto1p
uto3pa
u2tops
utor2a
u2tord
uto2re
uto4rin
4utou
u2töl
4utr
ut3rea
u2trou
ut3rü
utsau2
ut2säu
ut4schl
ut4schm
ut4scho
ut4schö
ut3ser
ut3s2k
ut1s2p
ut3sta
ut3sto
ut3tan
ut3t4l
utt1s2
utu2b
u2tum
utu4n
u2t1une
utu4re
utu3ro
utu5ru
u4tz
utze2
ut2zeh
utz3eng
utz2er
ut2zet
ut2z1in
ut2zis
ut2zö
ut2z1w
2u1u4
uum1
uum3a2
uume2
uungsma5
uungsmas8
u1ü4
u1v4
u2ve.
uve3rä
u1w
2u1x
ux2e
ux2o
ux3oe
uxt4
u1y
u2yo
2u1z
uze2
u2z1ec
u2z1ene
uz2er
uzo2f
uz3ot
uz1we
uz3z2
1üb
üb1ä
2übc
2übd
übe2
übe3le
übe4na
übe3ne
über1
überas4
ü4bet
üb3l
üb5r
2üc
ü1che
üch3l
üch4s1c
ücht4e
ücke4n
ück1er
ück3eri
ücker6ke
ü4d3a4
üde2l
üden2g
ü3d2ens
üd3o4
üdö4
üd3r
üd3s2
üd3t4
üdu2
üdwe4
üe2
üeb3
ü1ei
ü4f1a
ü2f1ä
ü2f1ei
ü2fent
üfer2
ü2f1erg
üf2fl
ü2f1i
üf3l
ü2fo
üf3ten
ü2fum
ü1g
üg2e
üge2l1a2
üge2lä
üge4lec
üge6lei6s
üge2lo
ügen3s
ü2g3l
ü2gn
üg3s
üh3a2
ü1he
ü2h1ei
ü2h3e4m
ü3hem.
ü2h1eng
ü2h1ent
ü2h1erf
ü2h1er2k
ü2h1er2z
ü2hex
üh1i4
üh1lä
üh2lel
ühl2er
üh2lö
ühl4sk
ühl4sta
ühl4sti
üh3mo
üh3ne
üh1o2
üh3r2e
ühr3ei.
ühre2n1
üh1ro
ühr3ta
ühs2
üh3sp
üh3stu
üh3t
üht2a
üht4r
ü1hu
üh1w
ü1k2
ül1a
ül2c
ü3l2e
ü4l3ef
üle2r3a2
ül2la4
üll1ad
üll1au
ül2lei
üll2er
ül4leu
ül2lic
ül2lid
ül2li2n
ül2lo
ül2lö
ülls2
ü2lö
ü1lu
ü2ma
ü2ment
üme2ra
ü2m1id
ü2m1in
ü2m1u
2ün
ü4n3a
ün2da
ün2dr
ü2n1erd
ünf1
ünf3li
ün2g3l
üngs2
ünster3
ün2za
ün2z1i
ünzu2
ün2zun
ün2zw
ü1pe
üpf3l
ü1pi
üp2pl
2ür
ür1a
ü2r1ei
ü2r1e2l
ür2f1er
ür2fl
ür2fr
ür4g3en4g
ürge4ra
ürk2e
ü3r2o3
ürom2
üror2
ür4ster
ürte2l1
ürt2h
ür2z1in
ür2zö
ür2z1w
üs2a
ü2schl
ü3s2e
üse1e2
üse3l2
üse4n
üse3r4
ü1sp
üs4s3a
üs2s1c
üss2e
ü4s3sel
üs4s3o
üs4st
üs2su
üs4t
ü2st3a
ü4stei
üste2n
ü2str
ü1su
ü1ß
2üt
ü1ta
ü2t1al
ü1te
üte3m
üte4n
üten3s
ütent4
üten3z2
üte2ra
üte2r1e
üterich6
üter3n
ü2t1h
ü1ti
üt3r
üt2se
üt2s1t
ütte4n
üt2tr
ü1tu
üt3zen
üt2zw
ü1v
ü1z
3va.
2v1ab
vab4r
va1c
va1f4
va3g
vag2a
va4gh
va2la
2valu
v2an.
2vanb
2vang
v2ans
2varb
v1arm
vas2
2v1ass
va2s3to
v4at
va2t1a4
va4tag
va2tei
va4t3eng
vates2
va2t3h
va4tid
vati3k2
va4tim
va4t1in
vati8ons.
va4tord
va4torg
va2t3r
vat3s2
va2t1u
vat3z
2v1au
vä1
2v1b
2v1c
2v1d2
1ve2
ve3an
ve3ar
veau3
ve3b4
ve3c
ve3d
ve3fa
ve3g
ve3h
2veig
v2eil
2vein
veit2
veits1
ve3la
2velan
vel2ar
ve4l1au
v1ele
ve3lei
ve3l2i
ve3lo
vel2o1p
ve3ma
ve3me
2v1emp
2ve3mu
ve3nal
ve4nas
ven2c
ve3ne
ve3ni
ve4nin
ve3nö
ven5st
ven4t3ag
vent4sk
ve3nü
2veo
ve3of
ve4pi
ver1
ver3a
ve3rad
2veral
ve3rand
ve3r4ane
vera4s
ver6bart
ver3b2l
ver3d2
vere2
verf4
ver3g4
vergas6
verga7sse
ve3ri
ve4rin
ver3k
vermas8sen
vern2
ver4sep
ver3sta
vert4
ver5te
ver3u4
ve3rus
ve3s
2vesc
2vese
ve4sh
ve4s1p
ves4t
ve3ta
vete1
vete3r
ve3ti
ve3tr
ve3t2s
2veü
ve3v
ve3w
2v1f4
2v1g
2v1h
vi1an
vi3ar
vi4a3t
vi2ä
vi3de
3vie
vie2h1a
vi2el
viela2
viele2
vi2er
vie4rec
vie2w1
vig2
2vii
v2il
vi2l1a
vi2lä
vi4l1e2h
vi2lei
viler4
vi4lers
vi2l1in
vi2ma2
vi4na
vin3d
ving3
vings2
v1ins
vi3sa
vise4
vi3s2i
vi3s2o
vi2sp
vis2u
viv2
viz2
vize5
2v1k
2v1l4
v3le
v2lie
2v1m
vm2e
2v1n2
1vo
2v1ob
vo2be
vob4l
voge2l1
vo2gu
vol2a
vol4la
voll3ar
voll7auf.
vollen6
voll5end
voller6t
2v1op
vo2r1
vo4r3a
voran8schl
vor3g
vo3ri
vo4rie
vo5rig
vorm2
vormen4
vor3o
vorö4
vort4
vot2a
voy1
2v1p
vr2
v1ra
v2ree
3v2ri
2v1s2
v3sz
2v1t
vue3
vu2enu
vu2et
2vumf
2vumg
2vumk
v1ü
2v1v
2v1w
2v1z
w2a
1waa
wab2bl
wa3che
wach8stub
wach4t4r
1wack
waffe2
waffel3
1wag
wa5ge
wage4n
wa2g3n
wa3go
1wah
wahl5ent
wah4ler
wah2l1i
1wal
wa2lar
2walb
wal4d3a
wal4din
wal2dr
wa2les
wa3li
wal4li4n
wal2m1
wals2
walt1a
wal6tere
wal6terl
wal2to
wal4tur
wa3na
wan2d1a2
wan2dr
w3anf
2wang
wan3g2e
wang4s
1wann
wan6z5en6d
wan4zer
wa2p
1war2e
ware1i
wa5ren
1warn
war4ni
wart4e
war2th
war2za
1was
wa3sa
was2c
wa4scha
wa3sche
wa3schi
wa4sch3l
wa4schw
wa3sh
wass4e2
wa3su
w2ä
1wäh
1wäl
wäm3
2wäng
1wäs3
wä5sc
wä4ss
wäss4e
2w3äu3
2w1b2
wbu2
2w1c
2w1d
we2a
we2b1a
webe1i
we2b3l
we2bo
we2b3r
we2e2
weed3
we2fl
1weg
we2g1a
we4g1ei
weg5ersc
we4g3l
we4gn
we2g1o2
we4g3r
weg1s
weg3s2a
1weh
weh4r3er4
wei2bl
weib4r
2weie
weifel6d
wei4fre
wei2gr
wei3k4
1weil
weinsau6
wei3sc
wei2t1r
weit1s
wei5ze
welle4
wel6schl
wel6schr
wel2t1
welt3a2
welte4
wel6t5en6d
wel4th
welt3i
welt3r
wem2ma2
wen3a2
wen2gl
we3n2i
wen2ka
wen4kla
wen4k3ri
we2r3a2
wer5be
werbe3i
wer2bl
werb2s
1werbu
wer3d2
5werdens
1werdu
werer2
wer2fl
2werg
wer2ga
wer6gels
wer2g3o
wer2gr
werin2
we3rins
we2ri4o
1werk.
wer4k1a
1werke
wer2ki
wer2k3l
wer2kn
wer2k3o
wer4k3re
wer2ku
we2rö
wer4sta
wer2ta
wer2tä
wert3ei
wer6teig
wer6t5erm
wer2th
wer4tin
wer2t1o2
wer4tre
wer4t3ri
wer4tum
1we3s2e
wesen4s3
we2sp
wes4t
we4st1a
we4st3ei
we5sten.
we6sten6d
we5stens
we4steu
we4sti
we2st1o4
we2st3r
we4stu
1wet
2wets
wett3s
2w1ey
2w1f
2w1g
whi2
w3ho
w2i
wicht4s
1wid
wi2e
2wieb
1wied
wie3l2
wie3n2e
wie4st
wik2
1wild
wim2ma
wim6ment
wim4m3u
win2a
win4d3ec
win3del
win6d5erz
1win2d5r
4wing
win2g3r
win2kl
win8n7er8sc
win2no
win4num
win3s
wint2
1wi4r
wire3
wisch3l
wi3s2e
wi2sp
1wiss
wiss4z
wi3st
wi3th
1witz.
1witzl
wiz2
2w1k
2w1l
2w1m
2wn
wns2a
wn3sh
1wo1c
wo2cha
woch2e4
1woh
woh4lei
woh4na
1wolf
wolf2s
wol4la
wol2lä
wol4ler
wor3a
wor3d
wo4r3i
worn2
wort1a
wor4tel
wor6terh
wor2t3r
worts2
wo4r3u
wor3ü
wot2
1wöc
wöl2fo
wört2h
2w1p
w2r
w3re
w3ro
2w1s
ws2e
w3s2h
w3s2k
w4s1u
2w1t
wti2
w2u
1wuc
wuch4sc
wuch4st
w3u2f
wuls2
wul3se
wund4e
wung3r
wung5s2
wun2s
wunsch5l
4wur.
wur2fa
wur2f1o
wur2fr
wurs4
1wurst
wus4
1wu2t1
1wüh
1würf
1würst
wüs4
2w1w
2w1z
x1a
1xa.
2xa2b
1x2ac
1x2ad
1xae
xa1fl
1x2a3g2
2xal
xal2l
xa2m
xand4
1xane
1xani
x2an3t2
x2anz
xa2r
1x2as
xau3
xaus2
xa2z
2x1b4
x1ce
x1ch
x1cl
4x1d
xda2
1xe
3xe.
2x1e4g
2xek
xe2l
3xel.
x1ele
xe3lei
x1em
3x2em.
2xemp
x2ems
x2en
3xen.
xen3s2
3x2er.
x2ere
2x1erl
xer2la
x2ern
xers2
x2ers.
3xes
2x1eu
2x1ex
2x1f
2x1g
2x1h
xi1c
xich2
2xid
xi2dan
xide2
xi2dei
xi2d3em
x1i2do
3x2ie
xie3l
xi3g
xi2ler
xili3a
xi2lo
xi2l1u
xim2
xin3s2
x2is
xi2sa
xi2s1e
xi2sp
xis5s2
xi3s2tä
xi2su
3xit
x1i4tu
xive4
x1j
4x1k2
xkal2
4x2l2
x3lä
x3le
2x1m
2x1n
2xod
2xoe4
x1o2r
xos2
2x1ö2
4x1p
xpor6ter
xpor4t3r
x1q
x1r
2x3s2
4x1t
xt1a
x3ta.
xta2b3
x3tan
xt2ant
x3tas
x2t1ä
x3tät
xtblock5
x2t1e2d
xt1ein
x2t1el
x2tent
x2t1er2f
x2t1ev
xtfi2
x2t1h
x2t1id
xti2la
x2til2l
x2t1o4
xtra3b4
x2t3ran
x2trau
xt3rec
xt3s2
x2t1um
x2t1un
1xu
xu1a
xu2n
2xunt
xu2s3
xusa2
xuss2
2xv
2x1w
3xy.
x1z
2y1ab
1ya2c
y2ach
ya1h
y1al.
yan2g
y1ank
ya1q
ya3ra
y1ät
y1b
ybe2r
y1c
y2chi
y3chis
ych3n
y1d
yd4r
ydri2
ydrid3
ydro3
y1e
y2ec
ye2d
y2ef
y2el2
yen4n
yera2
y2ere
yer2n1
y2e2s
y4es.
ye3s2p
ye4st
ye2th
y1f2
y1g
ygi2
ygie3
yg2l
y1h
y3ho
yhr2
2y1i4
y1j
y1k2
yke3n
yk3s
yl1a2
yl2a3g
y1l2ak
yla4l
y2lam
yl3ane
y1lant
yl4ante
yl4anti
yl2as
ylau2
yl3c
yle4
y2le.
yl1em
y2l1es
y2l1et
yli4n
yl4lo2s
yl2lö2
ylo1i2
yloid3
yloni1
yl2op
yl1ora
ym2a
ym4an
ym4ar
ym4as
ym4e
ymp2
ym2pha
ympi1e
ynä4r
yn2eu
ynk2
y2n1o2
yn2oz
yn3t2
yob2
y2od
yoga3
yom2
yon2a
y1ont
y1o2pe
y2ost
y1ou
2y1p
ypa2b3
ypa2n
yp2e2
ype4r3o2
y2pf
y2p1i2d
y2p1in
y2plo
y3po3
y4p3s
yp3th
ypu2
y2p1um
y1q
y1r
y3r2e
y3ri
yri1e
yri3en
y3ro
yro4ste
yrr2
2y1s
ys2an
ysch4
ys2e1
ysein2
ys1er
y4s3l
ysme3
ys2o
ys2pi
yst2e
yst2h
ys2tra
y4stro
y3s2ty
ysu2
y3s2z
y1t
y2te.
y2tes
yt2h
ythe1
y3to
y4t3r
yu2r
yur2e3
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
yzer2i
2z1a2b
zab3l
2z1ach
za1cha
za1chä
zach2s
2z1a2d
2z1af
za3gr
3z2ah
zah3len
zah4ner4
z1ak
4z3akk
2z1al
4z3ald
3zali
2z1a2m
z1a2n
4z3a4n4a
2z3anb
za3ne
2z3anf
2z3angs
3z2ank
zan2ka
z3anl
2z3anr
zanti1
za4pf
z1aq
z1ar
3zar.
2zarb
za3re
2zarm
3z2aro
z2arr
zar2t1r
2z1as
za3st4
2z1aß
z3at
zat2e
za2to
3zaub
2z1au2f
2z3aug
3zaun
z3aur
2z1aut
2z1äc
z2äh
3zähn
2z1äm
z1än
z1äp
z1är
2z1äus
2zäuß
4z3b4
zber2e
zbü1b
zbübe3
2z3c
2z3d2
zdan2
zdä1
3ze.
2zea
zeau3
zeaus4
2z1e2ben
2z1echo
ze1e2
zeeu3
2z1eff
z1e2ga
zehe4
zehen1
zeh2l
ze3ho
zei1f4
zeik4
zeil2
zei3la
zeile4
2z1ein
ze3in.
zeinbus6
z2e1ind
zei4ne
4z3einh
ze3inse
ze2i3s2
3zeit
zei2t1a
zei4t3er
zei2to
zei2tr
zeit3ri
zek4
ze2l1a
zela2d
zel3a2n
zelau2
ze2l1ä
zel3d4
4ze2lek
4zelem
ze2len
ze2l1er
ze2l1in
2z1e2lit
zel3la
zel4lab
zel4l3ac
zel4lar
zel2lä
zel4leh
zel6lein
zel6ler6t
zeller6z
zelli4n
zel4lum
zelm4
ze2l1o
zels2
zel3sa
zel3sz
zel2ti
zelu2
zembe2
2z1emp
5zen.
ze4n1ac
ze4nas
zen3au
ze2nä
ze3n2em
zenen1
4zenge.
z4engl
2zengp
2zeni
ze2nid
zenk2
zen3n
ze2n3o
ze4not
4zen4sem
zen4ser
zens2p
z2entn
z1ents
2zentw
2zentz
ze2nu
zen4z3er
zen2zw
zeo4r
3z2er.
zer3a
ze1ral
ze2rat
z2ere
ze5rek
zer2em
z2erfe
z3erfül
z2erga
2z1ergä
4z3ergeb
z4erges
z4ergl
zer4gon
4zergu
3z2erhe
2z3erhö
ze3ri
zerin6te
z2erko
3zerl.
zer4lau
zer4le.
4zerleb
zer4len
2zerlö
3z2ern
zer4nan
zer4n3e4b
zer4nei
2z1erö
zer2öf
2z1erq
4z3erreg
z2ers.
2z1er4sa
zerta2
zer4t3ag
zert4an
zer4tau
zer6tere
zer6terl
zer4tin
zer2to
6z5ertrag
zer6trau
z1erwe
4zerwei
z1erz
zer2ze
ze2s
3z2es.
ze3sc
zes1e
zes3er
ze4s3po
zes2sa
zessen4
zes6s5end
zes4ser4
zes2sp
ze3sta
zes2th
ze3str
ze2ß1
z2et.
2zeta
2ze2th
ze2tr
2zetts
zeu4gem
zeu2g3r
2z1eul
ze1ur
2z1e2x1
2z3f4
zfäs3
zfeue2
2z3g4
zgang5
zger2a
zger2s1
2z1h2
z2hen
zhir3
3zi.
zial5l
zi3alo
zi2ar
zich2o
zi2dei
zid3r
zie4ler
zie2l1i
zi1erh
zi1es
zi3ess
3zig
3z2il
zil2e
z2imm
2zimp
zim2t3
2z1ind
zin2e
zin3ei
2z1inf
z1inh
zi4n3in
zin1it
2z1inj
zin4na
zin4o
zin2sa
zin4ser
4zinsuf
zi2o3
zirk2
zirk6s
z1iso
zi2sp
zisse4
zis4t
zistras6
zi3s2z
zite4
zithe2
zi2t1o2
zit2u
ziv2
2z1j
4z1k4
2z1l2
z3ly
2z3m2
zmas6sen
zme2e
2z3n2
z3oas
2z1ob
2z1of
zo2gl
zog4s
2z1oh
zolla2
zol3len
zoller4
zol2li2
zonal2
zon3au
zon5s4
zon4t3er
zo2o
2z1ope
2z1o2r
zo3re
3z2orn
zor4ne
2z1osz
2z1ou
2z1o2z
2zö2f
2z1ök
z1öl
2zöl.
3z2öll
2zöls
2zön
2z3p4
2z1q
2z3r2
2z1s2
z3sa
zsau2
z3sh
z3sk
zspor2
4zst
z3str
z3sz
2z1t
zta2n
zt3ane
z2t1au
ztein1
zt3eins
zt2el
zte3ma
z2t1ent
z2t1erz
z3tes
zte3str
zt2et
zt1he
z3them
z3t2her
zt1hi
zt3ho
z3thr
z3thy
zt3rec
zt3ric
zt3s
zu3a
zu1ä2
zub4
zubus2
3zuc
zuch2e
zucht3r
zud4
zudi4
zu2el
zu3e2r1
zue2t
zu3f4
zug2em
zu4gent
zug2i
zu3gl
zu4gla
zu4glö
zu2go
zug4ste
2z1uhr
zu3hu
zu1i2
zu3k
zul2
2z1um.
zum2a
2z1umb
zumen2
2zumf
2zumg
zum2i
2zumk
2zuml
2zumr
2z1ums
zum2u
2zunab
zun2e
2z1unem
4zunget
2zungl
z1uni
2zu2nio
2zuniv
2zunr
2z1uns
2zunt
zuo2
zup2fi
zu3pl
zu3r2a
2z1urk
2z1url
2z1urn
2z1urs
2z1urt
zu3s2
zusch4
zu3t2
zut4r
zut4u
zut3z
zuz2
2zü4b
3züc
zür1c
2z1v
zw2
z1wac
2zwag
4zwah
4zwap
z1war
2zwa2s
2zwäs
2z1wed
2zweg
2zweh
z2weig
2zweil
zweiter6
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
2z1wes
z2wic
zwi4e
3zwing
2zwirt
z2wisc
2zwiss
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
2z1wü
zy1an.
zy2le
2z1z
z3z2a
zza3b4
z4z3al
zz4at
zze3s
z2z1id
z2z1in1
zz2ö
zzug4s
}

\endinput

%%% Local Variables:
%%% mode: tex
%%% coding: utf-8
%%% End:
